Utah statutes.
20A-2-102.   Registration a prerequisite to voting.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person may not vote at any election unless that person is registered to vote as required by this chapter.

(2)  A person may vote a provisional ballot as provided in Section 20A-2-307 for:

(a)  a regular general election;

(b)  a regular primary election; or

(c)  an election for federal office.



Amended by Chapter 34, 2003 General Session

